Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.270

Violations—Penalty.

Every person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor who:

(1) Violates or aids in the violation of any provision of this chapter, or

(2) Violates or aids in the violation of any rule or regulation of the commission.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.28.270. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 28; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-37.]